District of Columbia statutes.
29-1012.13

Rescinding dissolution.

(a)

A limited cooperative association may rescind its dissolution, unless a statement of termination applicable to the association is effective, the Superior Court has entered an order under § 29-1012.03 dissolving the association, or the Mayor has dissolved the association under § 29-106.02.

(b)

Rescinding dissolution under this section requires:

(1)

The consent of each member;

(2)

If a statement of dissolution applicable to the limited cooperative association has been filed by the Mayor but has not become effective, the delivery to the Mayor for filing of a statement of withdrawal applicable to the statement of dissolution; and

(3)

If a statement of dissolution applicable to the limited cooperative association is effective, the delivery to the Mayor for filing of a statement of correction under § 29-102.05 stating that dissolution has been rescinded under this section.

(c)

If a limited cooperative association rescinds its dissolution:

(1)

The association resumes carrying on its activities and affairs as if dissolution had never occurred;

(2)

Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, any liability incurred by the association after the dissolution and before the rescission is effective is determined as if dissolution had never occurred; and

(3)

The rights of a third party arising out of conduct in reliance on the dissolution before the third party knew or had notice of the rescission may not be adversely affected.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(j)(8)(F), 59 DCR 13171
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.